Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-812.01
Judicial nominations; Supreme Court; promulgate rules.

The Supreme Court shall promulgate rules regarding procedures to be followed in the nominating procedure, including the type of application to be filed, the type of presentation an applicant may make at the public hearing, factors, if any, other than those specifically described in section 24-811.01 relating to judicial quality for commission members to consider in determining whether a candidate is sufficiently qualified to be nominated, and such other rules as it feels will induce qualified lawyers to seek judicial office, and which will otherwise promote the true spirit of the judicial selection process now used in this state.

Laws 1973, LB 110, § 10;

Laws 1980, LB 730, § 5.